Nebraska, session 109, LB1190.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1190 LB1190
2026 2026
Section 1. Laws 2025, LB261, section 245, is amended to read:
Sec. 245. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 601 - Community and Rural Development
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 7,294,942 6,294,942
CASH FUND 36,575,991 21,671,030
FEDERAL FUND est. 54,572,337 54,632,192
PROGRAM TOTAL 98,443,270 82,598,164
SALARY LIMIT 3,330,071 3,381,786
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$6,580,762 General Funds, $33,726,860 Cash Funds, and $50,530,110 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$5,580,762 General Funds, $19,023,140 Cash Funds, and $50,530,110 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$250,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- Cash Funds from the Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund to conduct a study regarding
prefabricated housing in Nebraska.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for FY2025-26 $700,000
General Funds to provide aid funding to development districts formed
under sections 13-1901 to 13-1907. There is included in the amount shown
as aid for FY2026-27 $700,000 General Funds to provide aid funding to
development districts formed under sections 13-1901 to 13-1907.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for FY2025-26
$4,880,762 General Funds to provide aid for mentorship programs for
nonprofit organizations that meet eligibility requirements designed by
the Department of Economic Development to either improve reading levels
or promote professional growth for elementary students. There is included
in the amount shown as aid for FY2026-27 $4,880,762 General Funds to
provide aid for mentorship programs for nonprofit organizations that meet
-2-

LB1190 LB1190
2026 2026
eligibility requirements designed by the Department of Economic
Development to either improve reading levels or promote professional
growth for elementary students.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for FY2025-26
$1,000,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- General Funds for the
grant authorized in section 81-1213.04, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance for unexpended
obligations existing on June 30, 2025, for the Rural Workforce Housing
Investment Act, the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act, the
Nebraska Affordable Housing Act, and the Nebraska Rural Projects Act, is
hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 2. Original Laws 2025, LB261, section 245, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-